District of Columbia statutes.
25-724

Board authorized to further restrict hours of operation.

At the time of initial application or renewal of any class of license, the Board may further limit the hours of sale and delivery for a particular applicant (1) based on the Board’s findings of fact, conclusions of law, and order following a protest hearing, or (2) under the terms of a settlement agreement.

History

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-310, § 2(aa), 60 DCR 3410

Section References

This section is referenced in § 25-123 and § 25-723.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-310 substituted “settlement agreement” for “voluntary agreement”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(aa) of the Omnibus Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-597, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1001).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(aa) of the Omnibus Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-52, April 22, 2013, 60 DCR 6372, 20 DCSTAT 1388).